Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-424.04
Palliative care, defined.

Palliative care means specialized care or treatment for a person living with a serious illness that carries a high risk of mortality or negatively impacts quality of life. This type of care or treatment addresses the symptoms and stress of a serious illness, including pain. Palliative care is a team-based approach to care or treatment, providing essential support at any age and stage of a serious illness. It can be provided across care settings and along with curative treatment. The goal of palliative care is to improve quality of life for both the patient and the patient's family or care partner.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 72.